Vermont, session 2025-2026, H670.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 17 V.S.A. § 2563 is amended to read:
§ 2563. ADMITTING VOTER
(a) Before a person may be admitted to vote, he or she the person shall
announce his or her the person’s name and, if requested, his or her the person’s
place of residence in a clear and audible tone of voice, or present his or her the
person’s name in writing, or otherwise identify himself or herself by
appropriate documentation. The election officials attending the entrance of the
VT LEG #386102 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.670
2026 Page 2 of 7
polling place shall then verify that the person’s name appears on the checklist
for the polling place.
(1) If the name does appear, and if no one immediately challenges the
person’s right to vote on grounds of identity or having previously voted in the
same election, the election officials shall repeat the name of the person and:
(A)(i) If the checklist indicates that the person is a first-time voter in
the municipality who registered by mail or online, whose driver’s license,
nondriver identification number, or last four digits of his or her the person’s
Social Security number provided by the applicant have not been verified by the
Secretary of State, and who has not provided required identification before the
opening of the polls, require the person to present any one of the following: a
valid photo identification; a copy of a current utility bill; a copy of a current
bank statement; or a copy of a government check, paycheck, or any other
government document that shows the current name and address of the voter.
(ii) If the person is unable to produce the required information, the
person shall be afforded the opportunity to complete a new application for
addition to the checklist in accordance with section 2144 of this title.
(iii) The election officials shall note upon the checklist a first-time
voter in the municipality who has registered by mail and who produces the
required information, and place a mark next to the voter’s name on the
VT LEG #386102 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.670
2026 Page 3 of 7
checklist and allow the voter to proceed to the voting booth for the purpose of
voting.
(B) If the voter is not a first-time voter in the municipality, no
identification shall be required. The clerk shall place a check next to the
voter’s name on the checklist and allow the voter to proceed to the voting
booth for the purpose of voting.
(2) If the name does not appear, the person shall be afforded the
opportunity to complete an application for addition to the checklist in
accordance with section 2144 of this title.
(b)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, for all voting
methods, including in person, early, or absentee voting, the voter shall present
a valid photo identification issued by a government agency using documented
proof of U.S. citizenship.
(2) The presented identification shall include:
(i) a photograph of the voter;
(ii) the voter’s full legal name; and
(iii) the voter’s current residential address.
(3) Auxiliary forms of identification for residency may be used if the
citizenship identification lacks a current address, such as a U.S. passport.
(4) The presented identification shall be current and unexpired.
VT LEG #386102 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.670
2026 Page 4 of 7
(5) Identification issued exclusively to noncitizens shall not be
acceptable unless accompanied by separate proof of U.S. citizenship.
(6) Religious exemptions from the photo requirement shall be permitted
via a signed affidavit attesting to the voter’s religious objection.
(7) If the voter does not present the required identification, the voter
shall be offered a provisional ballot in accordance with subchapter 6A of this
chapter.
Sec. 2. 17 V.S.A. § 2537a is amended to read:
§ 2537a. MAILING OF GENERAL ELECTION BALLOTS
(a) For every general election, the Secretary of State’s office shall mail a
general election ballot to all active voters on the statewide voter checklist
described in section 2154 of this title.
(1) The mailing of the ballots shall commence not later than 43 days
before the election and shall be completed not later than October 1.
(2) A postage-paid return envelope, pre-addressed to the town or city
clerk of the town or city where the voter is registered to vote, shall be included
with the ballot sent to every voter in which the ballot may be mailed back to
the clerk. All postage cost shall be paid by the Secretary of State’s office.
(3) The address file to be used for the mailing shall be generated from
the statewide voter checklist as close as practicable to the date of the mailing
and in no case earlier than September 1.
VT LEG #386102 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.670
2026 Page 5 of 7
(4) The Secretary of State’s office shall include in the mailing to each
voter instructions for return of the voted ballot.
(b) General election ballots mailed by the Secretary of State’s office under
this section shall be returned by the voter to the town or city clerk in the town
or city where that voter is registered in accordance with the procedures for
return of ballots described in this subchapter.
(c) To ensure verification of voter identity and citizenship, the return
envelope shall include:
(1) a photocopy of the voter’s valid photo identification, as described in
subsection 2563(b) of this title; or
(2) the voter’s full Social Security number or State-issued identification
number.
(d) Ballots returned without the required identification information under
subsection (c) of this section shall be deemed defective and processed in
accordance with section 2547 of this subchapter.
Sec. 3. 17 V.S.A. § 2546 is amended to read:
§ 2546. RECEIPT OF BALLOTS BY CLERK; VOTER STATUS;
OPPORTUNITY TO CURE; PROCESSING ABSENTEE BALLOTS
(a) Town clerk; process generally. Beginning 45 days before the opening
of the polls on election day, upon receipt of a mailing envelope containing
ballots returned by a voter, the town clerk shall, within three business days or
VT LEG #386102 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.670
2026 Page 6 of 7
on the next day the office is open for business, whichever is later, direct two
election officials working together to do all of the following:
(1) open the mailing envelope and sort early voter absentee ballots by
ward and district, if necessary; and
(2) determine that the certificate has been signed, the voted ballot was
placed in the certificate envelope, the required identification information under
subsection 2537a(c) of this title has been provided, and the ballot is not
defective for any other reason pursuant to section 2547 of this subchapter.
* * *
Sec. 4. FREE STATE-ISSUED VOTER IDENTIFICATION CARDS
The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall provide free nondriver
identification cards to all eligible voters in the State for the purpose of voting,
upon presentation of documented proof of U.S. citizenship and proof of
residency. Such cards shall meet the requirements for acceptable voter
identification under 17 V.S.A. § 2563 and shall indicate U.S. citizenship status.
The Commissioner shall adopt rules in accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25
regarding the manner of accepting required documentation and issuance and
renewal of voter identification cards, including provisions for the expedited
issuance and renewal of voter identification cards, and the duration of validity
of the voter identification cards.
VT LEG #386102 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.670
2026 Page 7 of 7
Sec. 5. APPROPRIATION
The sum of $200,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Secretary of State in fiscal year 2027 for training election officials, public
education on new voter identification requirements, and issuance of free voter
identification cards.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386102 v.1